es: Forma de las palomitas de maíz: Balde/cubo; Set de regalo/lata; Granos; Paquete para microondas; Bolas de palomitas de maíz; Listo para consumir; Kit de condimento/glaseado; Paquetes tamaño snack; Kit para hacer palomitas en la estufa; Otro
sv: Popcornform: Hink/bägare; Presentförpackning/plåtburk; Kärnor; Mikrovågsförpackning; Popcornbollar; Färdig att äta; Krydd-/glazekit; Snackförpackningar; Poppkit för spishäll; Annat
bg-BG: Форма на пуканките: Кофа/кутия; Подаръчен комплект/метална кутия; Зърна; Пакет за микровълнова; Пуканки на топчета; Готови за консумация; Комплект подправки/глазура; Малки пакети; Комплект за приготвяне на котлон; Друго
en: Popcorn form: Bucket/tub; Gift set/tin; Kernels; Microwave pack; Popcorn balls; Ready-to-eat; Seasoning/glaze kit; Snack-size packs; Stovetop popping kit; Other
da: Form for popcorn: Spand/bøtte; Gavesæt/dåse; Kerner; Til mikrobølgeovn; Popcornkugler; Klar til at spise; Krydderi-/glasur-sæt; Snack-pakker; Sæt til grydepopcorn; Andet
vi: Hình dạng bỏng ngô: Xô/hộp; Bộ quà tặng/hộp thiếc; Hạt ngô; Gói quay vi sóng; Bỏng ngô viên tròn; Ăn liền; Bộ gia vị/nước xốt áo; Gói nhỏ; Bộ nổ bỏng trên bếp; Khác
de: Form des Popcorns: Eimer/Becher; Geschenkset/Dose; Kerne; Mikrowellen-Packung; Popcorn-Bälle; Verzehrfertig; Würz-/Glasur-Set; Snack-Größen; Herd-Zubereitungsset; Sonstige
nb: Popkornform: Bøtte/beger; Gavesett/boks; Kjerner; Mikrobølgepakke; Popcorn-kuler; Spiseklar; Krydder-/glasursett; Snackspakker; Popkornsett for kjele; Annet
fi: Popcorn-muoto: Ämpäri/rasia; Lahjasetti/peltirasia; Jyvät; Mikropakkaus; Popcorn-pallot; Valmis syötäväksi; Mauste-/kuorrutesarja; Välipalakokoiset pakkaukset; Kattilapopcorn-pakkaus; Muu
tr: Patlamış mısır formu: Kova/kutu; Hediye seti/teneke kutu; Cin mısır; Mikrodalga paketi; Patlamış mısır topları; Yemeye hazır; Baharat/sır kiti; Atıştırmalık paketleri; Ocakta patlatma kiti; Diğer
ja: ポップコーンの形: バケツ/タブ; ギフトセット/缶; 豆; 電子レンジ用パック; ポップコーンボール; 調理済み; シーズニング/グレーズキット; スナックサイズパック; コンロ調理用キット; その他
nl: Popcorn vorm: Emmer/bak; Cadeauset/blik; Pofmaïs; Magnetronverpakking; Popcornballen; Kant-en-klaar; Kruiden-/glazuurkit; Snackformaat-verpakkingen; Pofset voor op het fornuis; Overig
it: Forma dei popcorn: Secchiello/cestello; Set regalo/scatola di latta; Chicchi; Confezione per microonde; Palline di popcorn; Pronto al consumo; Kit di condimento/glassa; Confezioni formato snack; Kit per preparazione in padella; Altro
ko: 팝콘 모양: 버킷/통; 선물 세트/틴; 커널; 전자레인지용 팩; 팝콘 볼; 즉석 섭취용; 시즈닝/글레이즈 키트; 스낵 사이즈 팩; 스토브탑 팝핑 키트; 기타
cs: Popcorn forma: Kyblík/kelímek; Dárková sada / plechovka; Kukuřičná zrna; Balení do mikrovlnné trouby; Popcornové kuličky; K okamžité spotřebě; Sada s kořením/polevou; Malá balení; Sada pro přípravu na sporáku; Jiné
fr: Forme du pop-corn: Seau/pot; Coffret cadeau/boîte en métal; Grains; Sachet pour micro-ondes; Boules de pop-corn; Prêt à manger; Kit d’assaisonnement/glaçage; Sachets format collation; Kit de préparation à la casserole; Autre
zh-TW: 爆米花形式: 桶裝; 禮盒/鐵盒裝; 玉米粒; 微波包裝; 爆米花球; 即食; 調味/糖衣套組; 零食包; 爐灶爆玉米套組; 其他
pl: Forma popcornu: Wiadro/kubełek; Zestaw prezentowy / puszka; Ziarna; Opakowanie do mikrofalówki; Kulki z popcornu; Gotowy do spożycia; Zestaw przypraw/polew; Małe paczki przekąskowe; Zestaw do prażenia na kuchence; Inne
hu: Popcorn formája: Vödör/doboz; Ajándékszett/fémdoboz; Kukoricamag; Mikrohullámú sütős tasak; Popcorngolyók; Fogyasztásra kész; Ízesítő/máz készlet; Snack méretű tasakok; Tűzhelyes pattogtatós készlet; Egyéb
lt-LT: Spragėsių forma: Kibirėlis / indelis; Dovanų rinkinys / skardinė; Kukurūzų grūdai; Pakuotė mikrobangų krosnelei; Spragėsių rutuliukai; Paruošta vartoti; Prieskonių / glajaus rinkinys; Užkandžio dydžio pakuotės; Rinkinys spraginimui ant viryklės; Kita
zh-CN: 爆米花形态: 桶/盒; 礼品套装/罐装; 玉米粒; 微波包装; 爆米花球; 即食; 调味粉/糖浆套件; 零食大小包装; 炉灶爆米花套件; 其他
ro-RO: Formă de popcorn: Găleată/cutie; Set cadou/cutie metalică; Boabe; Pachet pentru microunde; Bile de popcorn; Gata pentru consum; Kit de condimentare/glazurare; Pachete pentru gustări; Kit pentru preparare pe aragaz; Altele
sl-SI: Oblika pokovke: Vedro/lonček; Darilni set/pločevinka; Koruzna zrna; Paket za mikrovalovno pečico; Kroglice iz kokic; Pripravljeno za uživanje; Komplet začimb/glazur; Paketi za prigrizek; Komplet za peko na štedilniku; Drugo
pt-BR: Pipoca forma: Balde/pote; Conjunto de presente/lata; Milho; Pacote para micro-ondas; Bolas de pipoca; Pronto para consumo; Kit de tempero/cobertura; Pacotes em tamanho de lanche; Kit para estourar no fogão; Outros
ru: Форма попкорна: Ведерко/банка; Подарочный набор/жестяная банка; Зерна; Упаковка для микроволновки; Шарики из попкорна; Готовый к употреблению; Набор приправ/глазури; Порционные упаковки; Набор для приготовления на плите; Другое
sk-SK: Forma popcornu: Vedro/miska; Darčeková súprava/plechovka; Zrnká; Balenie do mikrovlnky; Popcornové guľky; Hotové na konzumáciu; Súprava s korením/polevou; Porciované balenia; Súprava na prípravu na sporáku; Iná
th: ป๊อปคอร์น: ถัง/กล่องใส่; ชุดของขวัญ/กระป๋อง; เมล็ดข้าวโพดดิบ; แพ็กสำหรับไมโครเวฟ; ป๊อปคอร์นบอล; พร้อมทาน; ชุดเครื่องปรุง/เคลือบ; แพ็กขนาดของว่าง; ชุดทำป๊อปคอร์นบนเตา; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oblik za kokice: Kantica/posuda; Poklon set / limena kutija; Zrna; Pakiranje za mikrovalnu; Kuglice od kokica; Spremno za konzumaciju; Komplet začina/preljeva; Snack pakiranja; Komplet za pripremu na štednjaku; Ostalo
pt-PT: Formato de pipoca: Balde; Conjunto de presente/lata; Grãos; Pacote para micro-ondas; Bolas de pipocas; Pronto a comer; Kit de tempero/cobertura; Pacotes de tamanho snack; Kit de preparação para fogão; Outro
el: Φόρμα για ποπ κορν: Κουβάς/Κύπελλο; Σετ δώρου/Κουτί; Σπόροι; Συσκευασία μικροκυμάτων; Μπάλες ποπ κορν; Έτοιμο προς κατανάλωση; Κιτ καρυκευμάτων/γλάσου; Συσκευασίες μεγέθους σνακ; Κιτ παρασκευής σε κατσαρόλα; Άλλο